Louisiana, session 2026, HB198.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 46:452 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§452. Medicaid ambulatory surgical center reimbursement plan; Medicare rate
comparability
A.(1) The Louisiana Department of Health shall develop and implement a
plan for increased Medicaid managed care organization reimbursement rates and
fee-for-service reimbursement rates for gastroenterology, dental ophthalmology,
dental and otolaryngology procedures conducted at ambulatory surgical centers.
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 198 ENROLLED
(2) The reimbursement rate established pursuant to this Section shall be the
lesser of the following:
(a) The rate paid for the same or similar procedure in an outpatient hospital
setting.
(b) One hundred percent of the Medicare rate for the same or similar
procedure.
(3) The plan shall include procedure codes utilized for gastroenterology,
ophthalmology, dental and otolaryngology procedures conducted at ambulatory
surgical centers and the estimated cost of implementation of the plan.
B. The Louisiana Department of Health shall take all necessary actions to
annually update the reimbursement rates for gastroenterology, dental,
ophthalmology, and otolaryngology procedures conducted at ambulatory surgical
centers in accordance with the methodology provided in Subsection A of this
Section.
C. The Louisiana Department of Health shall submit the plan required by this
Section to the Senate Committee on Health and Welfare, the Senate Committee on
Finance, the House Committee on Health and Welfare, and the House Committee on
Appropriations no later than October 1, 2026.
D. Not later than October 1, 2026, the Louisiana Department of Health shall
take all necessary actions, including but not limited to filing any Medicaid state plan
amendment required by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to
implement the provisions of this Section.
E. The Louisiana Department of Health shall promulgate all rules and
regulations in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act as are necessary to
implement the provisions of this Section.
Section 2. Not later than October 1, 2026, the Louisiana Department of Health shall
take all necessary actions including but not limited to filing a Medicaid state plan
amendment, to implement the provisions of Section 1 of this Act.
Section 3. The implementation of the provisions of this Act shall be subject to the
appropriation of funds by the legislature for this purpose.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 198 ENROLLED
Section 4. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.